Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.880

Right-of-way donations—Credit against required improvements.

Where the zoning and planning provisions of a city or town require landscaping, parking, or other improvements as a condition to granting permits for commercial or industrial developments, the city or town may credit donations of right-of-way in excess of that required for traffic improvement against such landscaping, parking, or other requirements.

[ 1987 c 267 s 7.]

NOTES:

Right-of-way donations: Chapter 47.14 RCW.